South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3561.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-170(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Authorized emergency vehicles for purposes of this section include the following: (1) fire department vehicles; (2) police vehicles; (3) ambulances and rescue squad vehicles which are publicly owned; (4) vehicles of coroners and deputy coroners of the forty-six counties as designated by the coroners; (5) emergency vehicles designated by the fire department or the chief of police of a municipality; (6) county government litter enforcement vehicles used by certified law enforcement Class 3 litter control officers; (7) Department of Natural Resources vehicles, federal natural resources vehicles, and forestry commission vehicles when being used in the performance of law enforcement duties; (8) public and private vehicles while transporting individuals actually engaged in emergency activities because one or more occupants belong to a fire department, volunteer fire department, police department, sheriff's office, authorized county government litter enforcement office, rescue squad, or volunteer rescue squad; (9) county or municipal government jail or corrections vehicles used by certified jail or corrections officers, and emergency vehicles designated by the Director of the South Carolina Department of Corrections; (10) vehicles designated by the Commissioner of the Department of Health and Environmental Control when being used in the performance of law enforcement or emergency response duties.; (11) federal law enforcement, military, and emergency vehicles; and (12) organ procurement organization vehicles, which means vehicles operated by organizations that perform or coordinate the procurement, preservation, and transport of organs and maintain systems for locating prospective recipients for available organs; and (13) Public Safety Answering Point (PSAP) or Radio Communication Vehicles that are owned by the State, counties, or municipalities for the purpose of supporting emergency networks while engaged in emergency activities. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----